District of Columbia statutes.
5-121.03

Acting without compliance with law.

Any person practicing as a private detective or advertising or holding himself out as such without first complying with the provisions of law relative to private detectives shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment in the District Jail for a period not exceeding 11 months and 29 days.

History

Feb. 28, 1901, 31 Stat. 820, ch. 623, § 5

Cross References

“Detectives” defined and licensing of private detectives, see § 47-2839.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-173.
1973 Ed., § 4-173.